Massachusetts, session 194th, S659.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
(a) Notwithstanding any special or general law, there shall be a special commission,
established and governed by section 2A of chapter 4 of the General Laws, to scope a state grant
or low-interest loan program for structural elevation or acquisition of properties prone to
flooding in the commonwealth. Components of consideration for the structure of the program
shall include: (i) funding sources; (ii) eligible expenses; (iii) applicant eligibility; (iv) the
establishment of a cost-benefit analysis in determining applicant eligibility; (v) risks and hazards
identified in the integrated state hazard mitigation and climate adaptation plan and strategies to
build resiliency; and (vi) program expenditures and pay outs.
of 3

(b) The special commission shall consist of: the secretary of energy and environmental
affairs or a designee, who shall serve as the commission chair; 2 members of the house of
representatives, 1 of whom shall be appointed by the minority leader; 2 members of the senate, 1
of whom shall be appointed by the minority leader; the chair of the state board of building
regulation and standards or a designee; the director of the office of coastal zone management or a
designee; 2 persons to be appointed by the director of the Massachusetts Emergency
Management Agency, 1 of whom shall be a contractor with experience in home elevations and 1
of whom shall be an insurance agent with knowledge in flood insurance and experience in
guiding and consulting for mitigation activities; the acting state hazard mitigation officer of the
state hazard mitigation team; the acting hazard mitigation grants supervisor of the state hazard
mitigation team; a licensed lender with knowledge in flood insurance, 203K home loan lending
and traditional loans used for mitigation activities who shall be appointed by the acting state
hazard mitigation officer of the state hazard mitigation team; and 3 persons to be appointed by
the governor, 1 of whom shall be a representative from a statewide environmental group with
experience in coastal resiliency strategies and nature based solutions, 1 of whom shall be a
representative of the executive office of energy and environmental affairs with knowledge of
climate change adaptation, and 1 of whom shall be a representative from the executive office of
public safety and security with knowledge of the federal hazard mitigation grant program and
experience with mitigation activities. The first meeting of the special commission shall take
place not later than December 1, 2025.
(c) The special commission shall submit its preliminary draft of any recommendations or
legislation to the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate and the joint committee on
environment, natural resources and agriculture not later than September 1, 2026. The special
of 3

commission shall submit its final draft of the program scope, together with any additional
recommendations or drafts of legislation necessary to carry those recommendations into effect,
by filing the same with the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate and the joint
committee on environment, natural resources and agriculture not later than December 1, 2026.
of 3